Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 3
Perfection and Priority

§ 28-9-301. Law governing perfection and priority of security interests.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 28-9-303 through 28-9-306[, Idaho Code], the following rules determine the law governing perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in collateral:

Except as otherwise provided in this section, while a debtor is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in collateral.

While collateral is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a possessory security interest in that collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, while tangible negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money or tangible chattel paper is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs:

Perfection of a security interest in the goods by filing a fixture filing;

Perfection of a security interest in timber to be cut; and

The effect of perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a nonpossessory security interest in the collateral.

The local law of the jurisdiction in which the wellhead or minehead is located governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in as-extracted collateral.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-301, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 25, p. 77.

§ 28-9-302. Law governing perfection and priority of agricultural liens.

While farm products are located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of an agricultural lien on the farm products.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-302, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-303. Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in goods covered by a certificate of title.

This section applies to goods covered by a certificate of title, even if there is no other relationship between the jurisdiction under whose certificate of title the goods are covered and the goods or the debtor.

Goods become covered by a certificate of title when a valid application for the certificate of title and the applicable fee are delivered to the appropriate authority. Goods cease to be covered by a certificate of title at the earlier of the time the certificate of title ceases to be effective under the law of the issuing jurisdiction or the time the goods become covered subsequently by a certificate of title issued by another jurisdiction.

The local law of the jurisdiction under whose certificate of title the goods are covered governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title from the time the goods become covered by the certificate of title until the goods cease to be covered by the certificate of title.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-303, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-304. Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in deposit accounts.

The local law of a bank’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a deposit account maintained with that bank.

The following rules determine a bank’s jurisdiction for purposes of this part:

If an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction for purposes of this part, this chapter, or the uniform commercial code, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction.

If paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction.

If neither paragraph (1) nor (2) of this subsection applies and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the deposit account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction.

If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the bank’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the customer’s account is located.

If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the bank’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the bank is located.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-304, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2002, ch. 107, § 2, p. 290.

§ 28-9-305. Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in investment property.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, the following rules apply:

While a security certificate is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in the certificated security represented thereby.

The local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction as specified in section 28-8-110(4)[, Idaho Code,] governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in an uncertificated security.

The local law of the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction as specified in section 28-8-110(5)[, Idaho Code,] governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a security entitlement or securities account.

The local law of the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account.

The following rules determine a commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction for purposes of this part:

If an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction for purposes of this part, this chapter, or the uniform commercial code, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction.

If paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply and an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction.

If neither paragraph (1) nor (2) of this subsection applies and an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the commodity account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction.

If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the commodity customer’s account is located.

If none of the preceding paragraphs apply, the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the commodity intermediary is located.

The local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located governs:

Perfection of a security interest in investment property by filing;

Automatic perfection of a security interest in investment property created by a broker or securities intermediary; and

Automatic perfection of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account created by a commodity intermediary.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-305, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-306. Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in letter of credit rights.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction or a nominated person’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a letter of credit right if the issuer’s jurisdiction or nominated person’s jurisdiction is a state.

For purposes of this part, an issuer’s jurisdiction or nominated person’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction whose law governs the liability of the issuer or nominated person with respect to the letter of credit right as provided in section 28-5-116[, Idaho Code].

This section does not apply to a security interest that is perfected only under section 28-9-308(d)[, Idaho Code].

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-306, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-307. Location of debtor.

In this section, “place of business” means a place where a debtor conducts its affairs.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the following rules determine a debtor’s location:

A debtor who is an individual is located at the individual’s principal residence.

A debtor that is an organization and has only one (1) place of business is located at its place of business.

A debtor that is an organization and has more than one (1) place of business is located at its chief executive office.

Subsection (b) of this section applies only if a debtor’s residence, place of business, or chief executive office, as applicable, is located in a jurisdiction whose law generally requires information concerning the existence of a nonpossessory security interest to be made generally available in a filing, recording or registration system as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral. If subsection (b) of this section does not apply, the debtor is located in the District of Columbia.

A person that ceases to exist, have a residence, or have a place of business continues to be located in the jurisdiction specified by subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

A registered organization that is organized under the law of a state is located in that state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (i) of this section, a registered organization that is organized under the law of the United States and a branch or agency of a bank that is not organized under the law of the United States or a state are located:

In the state that the law of the United States designates, if the law designates a state of location;

In the state that the registered organization, branch or agency designates, if the law of the United States authorizes the registered organization, branch or agency to designate its state of location, including by designating its main office, home office or other comparable office; or

In the District of Columbia, if neither paragraph (1) nor paragraph (2) of this subsection applies.

A registered organization continues to be located in the jurisdiction specified by subsection (e) or (f) of this section notwithstanding:

The suspension, revocation, forfeiture or lapse of the registered organization’s status as such in its jurisdiction of organization; or

The dissolution, winding up, or cancellation of the existence of the registered organization.

The United States is located in the District of Columbia.

A branch or agency of a bank that is not organized under the law of the United States or a state is located in the state in which the branch or agency is licensed, if all branches and agencies of the bank are licensed in only one (1) state.

A foreign air carrier under the federal aviation act of 1958, as amended, is located at the designated office of the agent upon which service of process may be made on behalf of the carrier.

This section applies only for purposes of this part.
History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-307, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 3, p. 381.

§ 28-9-308. When security interest or agricultural lien is perfected — Continuity of perfection.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 28-9-309[, Idaho Code], a security interest is perfected if it has attached and all of the applicable requirements for perfection in sections 28-9-310 through 28-9-316[, Idaho Code,] have been satisfied. A security interest is perfected when it attaches if the applicable requirements are satisfied before the security interest attaches.

An agricultural lien is perfected if it has become effective and all of the applicable requirements for perfection in section 28-9-310[, Idaho Code,] have been satisfied. An agricultural lien is perfected when it becomes effective if the applicable requirements are satisfied before the agricultural lien becomes effective.

A security interest or agricultural lien is perfected continuously if it is originally perfected by one (1) method under this chapter and is later perfected by another method under this chapter, without an intermediate period when it was unperfected.

Perfection of a security interest in collateral also perfects a security interest in a supporting obligation for the collateral.

Perfection of a security interest in a right to payment or performance also perfects a security interest in a security interest, mortgage or other lien on personal or real property securing the right.

Perfection of a security interest in a securities account also perfects a security interest in the security entitlements carried in the securities account.

Perfection of a security interest in a commodity account also perfects a security interest in the commodity contracts carried in the commodity account.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-308, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-309. Security interest perfected upon attachment.

The following security interests are perfected when they attach:

A purchase-money security interest in consumer goods, except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-311(b)[, Idaho Code,] with respect to consumer goods that are subject to a statute or treaty described in section 28-9-311(a)[, Idaho Code];

An assignment of accounts or payment intangibles which does not by itself or in conjunction with other assignments to the same assignee transfer a significant part of the assignor’s outstanding accounts or payment intangibles;

A sale of a payment intangible;

A sale of a promissory note;

A security interest created by the assignment of a health care insurance receivable to the provider of the health care goods or services;

A security interest arising under section 28-2-401, 28-2-505, 28-2-711(3) or 28-12-508(5)[, Idaho Code], until the debtor obtains possession of the collateral;

A security interest of a collecting bank arising under section 28-4-210[, Idaho Code];

A security interest of an issuer or nominated person arising under section 28-5-120[, Idaho Code];

A security interest arising in the delivery of a financial asset under section 28-9-206(c)[, Idaho Code];

A security interest in investment property created by a broker or securities intermediary;

A security interest in a commodity contract or a commodity account created by a commodity intermediary;

An assignment for the benefit of all creditors of the transferor and subsequent transfers by the assignee thereunder;

A security interest created by an assignment of a beneficial interest in a decedent’s estate; and

A sale by an individual of an account that is a right to payment of winnings in a lottery or other game of chance.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-309, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2002, ch. 107, § 3, p. 290.

§ 28-9-310. When filing required to perfect security interest or agricultural lien — Security interests and agricultural liens to which filing provisions do not apply.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section and section 28-9-312(b)[, Idaho Code], a financing statement must be filed to perfect all security interests and agricultural liens.

The filing of a financing statement is not necessary to perfect a security interest:

That is perfected under section 28-9-308(d), (e), (f) or (g)[, Idaho Code];

That is perfected under section 28-9-309[, Idaho Code,] when it attaches;

In property subject to a statute, regulation or treaty described in section 28-9-311(a)[, Idaho Code];

In goods in possession of a bailee which is perfected under section 28-9-312(d)(1) or (2)[, Idaho Code];

In certificated securities, documents, goods or instruments which is perfected without filing, control, or possession under section 28-9-312(e), (f) or (g)[, Idaho Code];

In collateral in the secured party’s possession under section 28-9-313[, Idaho Code];

In a certificated security which is perfected by delivery of the security certificate to the secured party under section 28-9-313[, Idaho Code];

In deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents, investment property, or letter of credit rights which is perfected by control under section 28-9-314[, Idaho Code];

In proceeds which is perfected under section 28-9-315[, Idaho Code];

That is perfected under section 28-9-316[, Idaho Code]; or

In timber sold by the state of Idaho.

If a secured party assigns a perfected security interest or agricultural lien, a filing under this chapter is not required to continue the perfected status of the security interest against creditors of and transferees from the original debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-310, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 26, p. 77; am. 2010, ch. 154, § 1, p. 329.

§ 28-9-311. Perfection of security interests in property subject to certain statutes, regulations and treaties.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, the filing of a financing statement is not necessary or effective to perfect a security interest in property subject to:

A statute, regulation or treaty of the United States whose requirements for a security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property preempt section 28-9-310(a), Idaho Code;

Section 49-510, Idaho Code; or

A statute of another jurisdiction which provides for a security interest to be indicated on a certificate of title as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property.

Compliance with the requirements of a statute, regulation or treaty described in subsection (a) of this section for obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor is equivalent to the filing of a financing statement under this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section and sections 28-9-313 and 28-9-316(d) and (e), Idaho Code, for goods covered by a certificate of title, a security interest in property subject to a statute, regulation or treaty described in subsection (a) of this section may be perfected only by compliance with those requirements, and a security interest so perfected remains perfected notwithstanding a change in the use or transfer of possession of the collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section and section 28-9-316(d) and (e), Idaho Code, duration and renewal of perfection of a security interest perfected by compliance with the requirements prescribed by a statute, regulation or treaty described in subsection (a) of this section are governed by the statute, regulation or treaty. In other respects, the security interest is subject to this chapter.

During any period in which collateral subject to a statute specified in subsection (a)(2) of this section is inventory held for sale or lease by a person or leased by that person as lessor and that person is in the business of selling or leasing goods of that kind, this section does not apply to a security interest in that collateral created by that person as debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-311, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 4, p. 381.

§ 28-9-312. Perfection of security interests in chattel paper, deposit accounts, documents, goods covered by documents, instruments, investment property, letter of credit rights and money — Perfection by permissive filing — Temporary perfection without filing or transfer of possession.

A security interest in chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments or investment property may be perfected by filing.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-315(c) and (d)[, Idaho Code,] for proceeds:

A security interest in a deposit account may be perfected only by control under section 28-9-314[, Idaho Code];

And except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-308(d)[, Idaho Code], a security interest in a letter of credit right may be perfected only by control under section 28-9-314[, Idaho Code]; and

A security interest in money may be perfected only by the secured party’s taking possession under section 28-9-313[, Idaho Code].

While goods are in the possession of a bailee that has issued a negotiable document covering the goods:

A security interest in the goods may be perfected by perfecting a security interest in the document; and

A security interest perfected in the document has priority over any security interest that becomes perfected in the goods by another method during that time.

While goods are in the possession of a bailee that has issued a nonnegotiable document covering the goods, a security interest in the goods may be perfected by:

Issuance of a document in the name of the secured party;

The bailee’s receipt of notification of the secured party’s interest; or

Filing as to the goods.

A security interest in certificated securities, negotiable documents or instruments is perfected without filing or the taking of possession or control for a period of twenty (20) days from the time it attaches to the extent that it arises for new value given under an authenticated security agreement.

A perfected security interest in a negotiable document or goods in possession of a bailee, other than one that has issued a negotiable document for the goods, remains perfected for twenty (20) days without filing if the secured party makes available to the debtor the goods or documents representing the goods for the purpose of:

Ultimate sale or exchange; or

Loading, unloading, storing, shipping, transshipping, manufacturing, processing or otherwise dealing with them in a manner preliminary to their sale or exchange.

A perfected security interest in a certificated security or instrument remains perfected for twenty (20) days without filing if the secured party delivers the security certificate or instrument to the debtor for the purpose of:

Ultimate sale or exchange; or

Presentation, collection, enforcement, renewal or registration of transfer.
(h) After the twenty (20) day period specified in subsection (e), (f) or (g) of this section expires, perfection depends upon compliance with this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-312, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 27, p. 77.

§ 28-9-313. When possession by or delivery to secured party perfects security interest without filing.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a secured party may perfect a security interest in tangible negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money or tangible chattel paper by taking possession of the collateral. A secured party may perfect a security interest in certificated securities by taking delivery of the certificated securities under section 28-8-301[, Idaho Code].

With respect to goods covered by a certificate of title issued by this state, a secured party may perfect a security interest in the goods by taking possession of the goods only in the circumstances described in section 28-9-316(d)[, Idaho Code].

With respect to collateral other than certificated securities and goods covered by a document, a secured party takes possession of collateral in the possession of a person other than the debtor, the secured party or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary course of the debtor’s business, when:

The person in possession authenticates a record acknowledging that it holds possession of the collateral for the secured party’s benefit; or

The person takes possession of the collateral after having authenticated a record acknowledging that it will hold possession of collateral for the secured party’s benefit.

If perfection of a security interest depends upon possession of the collateral by a secured party, perfection occurs no earlier than the time the secured party takes possession and continues only while the secured party retains possession.

A security interest in a certificated security in registered form is perfected by delivery when delivery of the certificated security occurs under section 28-8-301[, Idaho Code], and remains perfected by delivery until the debtor obtains possession of the security certificate.

A person in possession of collateral is not required to acknowledge that it holds possession for a secured party’s benefit.

If a person acknowledges that it holds possession for the secured party’s benefit:

The acknowledgment is effective under subsection (c) of this section or section 28-8-301(1)[, Idaho Code], even if the acknowledgment violates the rights of a debtor; and

Unless the person otherwise agrees, or law other than this chapter otherwise provides, the person does not owe any duty to the secured party and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to another person.

A secured party having possession of collateral does not relinquish possession by delivering the collateral to a person other than the debtor or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary course of the debtor’s business if the person was instructed before the delivery or is instructed contemporaneously with the delivery:

To hold possession of the collateral for the secured party’s benefit; or

To redeliver the collateral to the secured party.

A secured party does not relinquish possession, even if a delivery under subsection (h) of this section violates the rights of a debtor. A person to which collateral is delivered under subsection (h) of this section does not owe any duty to the secured party and is not required to confirm the delivery to another person unless the person otherwise agrees, or law other than this chapter otherwise provides.
History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-313, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 28, p. 77.

§ 28-9-314. Perfection by control.

A security interest in investment property, deposit accounts, letter of credit rights, electronic chattel paper, or electronic documents may be perfected by control of the collateral under section 28-7-106, 28-9-104, 28-9-105, 28-9-106 or 28-9-107[, Idaho Code].

A security interest in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, letter of credit rights, or electronic documents is perfected by control under section 28-7-106, 28-9-104, 28-9-105 or 28-9-107[, Idaho Code], when the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control only while the secured party retains control.

A security interest in investment property is perfected by control under section 28-9-106[, Idaho Code,] from the time the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control until:

The secured party does not have control; and

One (1) of the following occurs:

if the collateral is a certificated security, the debtor has or acquires possession of the security certificate;

if the collateral is an uncertificated security, the issuer has registered or registers the debtor as the registered owner; or

if the collateral is a security entitlement, the debtor is or becomes the entitlement holder.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-314, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 29, p. 77.

§ 28-9-315. Secured party’s rights on disposition of collateral and in proceeds.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and in section 28-2-403(2)[, Idaho Code]:

A security interest or agricultural lien continues in collateral notwithstanding sale, lease, license, exchange or other disposition thereof unless the secured party authorized the disposition free of the security interest or agricultural lien; and

A security interest attaches to any identifiable proceeds of collateral.

Proceeds that are commingled with other property are identifiable proceeds:

If the proceeds are goods, to the extent provided by section 28-9-336[, Idaho Code]; and

If the proceeds are not goods, to the extent that the secured party identifies the proceeds by a method of tracing, including application of equitable principles, that is permitted under law other than this chapter with respect to commingled property of the type involved.

A security interest in proceeds is a perfected security interest if the security interest in the original collateral was perfected.

A perfected security interest in proceeds becomes unperfected on the twenty-first day after the security interest attaches to the proceeds unless:

The following conditions are satisfied:

a filed financing statement covers the original collateral;

the proceeds are collateral in which a security interest may be perfected by filing in the office in which the financing statement has been filed; and

the proceeds are not acquired with cash proceeds;

The proceeds are identifiable cash proceeds; or

The security interest in the proceeds is perfected other than under subsection (c) of this section when the security interest attaches to the proceeds or within twenty (20) days thereafter.

If a filed financing statement covers the original collateral, a security interest in proceeds which remains perfected under subsection (d)(1) of this section becomes unperfected at the later of:

When the effectiveness of the filed financing statement lapses under section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code,] or is terminated under section 28-9-513[, Idaho Code]; or

The twenty-first day after the security interest attaches to the proceeds.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-315, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-316. Effect of change in governing law.

A security interest perfected pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in section 28-9-301(1) or 28-9-305(c), Idaho Code, remains perfected until the earliest of:

The time perfection would have ceased under the law of that jurisdiction;

The expiration of four (4) months after a change of the debtor’s location to another jurisdiction; or

The expiration of one (1) year after a transfer of collateral to a person that thereby becomes a debtor and is located in another jurisdiction.

If a security interest described in subsection (a) of this section becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event described in that subsection, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

A possessory security interest in collateral, other than goods covered by a certificate of title and as-extracted collateral consisting of goods, remains continuously perfected if:

The collateral is located in one (1) jurisdiction and subject to a security interest perfected under the law of that jurisdiction;

Thereafter the collateral is brought into another jurisdiction; and

Upon entry into the other jurisdiction, the security interest is perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title which is perfected by any method under the law of another jurisdiction when the goods become covered by a certificate of title from this state remains perfected until the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become so covered.

A security interest described in subsection (d) of this section becomes unperfected as against a purchaser of the goods for value and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the goods for value if the applicable requirements for perfection under section 28-9-311(b) or 28-9-313, Idaho Code, are not satisfied before the earlier of:

The time the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become covered by a certificate of title from this state; or

The expiration of four (4) months after the goods had become so covered.

A security interest in deposit accounts, letter of credit rights, or investment property which is perfected under the law of the bank’s jurisdiction, the issuer’s jurisdiction, a nominated person’s jurisdiction, the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction, or the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction, as applicable, remains perfected until the earlier of:

The time the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of that jurisdiction; or

The expiration of four (4) months after a change of the applicable jurisdiction to another jurisdiction.

If a security interest described in subsection (f) of this section becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time or the end of the period described in that subsection, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of that time or the end of that period, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.
(h) The following rules apply to collateral to which a security interest attaches within four (4) months after the debtor changes its location to another jurisdiction:

A financing statement filed before the change pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in section 28-9-301(1) or 28-9-305(c), Idaho Code, is effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if the debtor had not changed its location.

If a security interest that is perfected by a financing statement that is effective under paragraph (1) of this subsection becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time the financing statement would have become ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in section 28-9-301(1) or 28-9-305(c), Idaho Code, or the expiration of the four (4) month period, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event, it becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

If a financing statement naming an original debtor is filed pursuant to the law of the jurisdiction designated in section 28-9-301(1) or 28-9-305(c), Idaho Code, and the new debtor is located in another jurisdiction, the following rules apply:

(1) The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral in which the new debtor has or acquires rights before or within four (4) months after the new debtor becomes bound under section 28-9-203(d), Idaho Code, if the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if the collateral had been acquired by the original debtor.

(2) A security interest that is perfected by the financing statement and that becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the expiration of the four (4) month period or the time the financing statement would have become ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in section 28-9-301(1) or 28-9-305(c), Idaho Code, remains perfected thereafter. A security interest that is perfected by the financing statement but that does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event becomes unperfected and is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-316, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 5, p. 381.

§ 28-9-317. Interests that take priority over or take free of security interest or agricultural lien.

A security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to the rights of:

A person entitled to priority under section 28-9-322, Idaho Code; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a person that becomes a lien creditor before the earlier of the time:

the security interest or agricultural lien is perfected; or

one (1) of the conditions specified in section 28-9-203(b)(3), Idaho Code, is met and a financing statement covering the collateral is filed.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a buyer, other than a secured party, of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments or a certificated security takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of this section, a lessee of goods takes free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the lessee gives value and receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.

A licensee of a general intangible or a buyer, other than a secured party, of collateral other than tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods, instruments or a certificated security takes free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value without knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 28-9-320 and 28-9-321, Idaho Code, if a person files a financing statement with respect to a purchase-money security interest before or within twenty (20) days after the debtor receives delivery of the collateral, the security interest takes priority over the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor which arise between the time the security interest attaches and the time of filing.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-317, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 30, p. 77; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 6, p. 381.

§ 28-9-318. No interest retained in right to payment that is sold — Rights and title of seller of account or chattel paper with respect to creditors and purchasers.

A debtor that has sold an account, chattel paper, payment intangible or promissory note does not retain a legal or equitable interest in the collateral sold.

For purposes of determining the rights of creditors of, and purchasers for value of an account or chattel paper from, a debtor that has sold an account or chattel paper, while the buyer’s security interest is unperfected, the debtor is deemed to have rights and title to the account or chattel paper identical to those the debtor sold.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-318, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.